New York, session 2025-2026, S10660.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings and intent. The legislature finds 2 that: 3 1. Individuals with disabilities may face increased risk of injury and 4 death in aquatic environments due to physical, developmental, intellec- 5 tual, cognitive, sensory, behavioral, or other functional limitations 6 affecting aquatic safety. 7 2. The federal Medicaid program permits coverage of habilitative 8 services under home and community-based services waivers pursuant to 9 section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act. 10 3. New York has made significant investments in public aquatic infras- 11 tructure through the New York state swimming infrastructure and munici- 12 pal access initiative, and that such investments should be leveraged to 13 improve access to adaptive aquatic safety services. 14 4. Adaptive aquatic safety instruction, when individually designed and 15 based on identified functional needs, constitutes a habilitative service 16 that develops functional safety skills, reduces preventable injury risk, 17 and supports community integration. 18 5. Improving disability competency among aquatic professionals is 19 essential to reducing preventable drownings and promoting safe partic- 20 ipation in aquatic activities by individuals with disabilities. 21 6. The legislature further finds that expanding disability competency 22 among aquatic professionals will improve opportunities for individuals 23 with disabilities to safely participate in community-based aquatic 24 recreation in the most integrated setting appropriate to their individ- 25 ual needs and preferences. 26 7. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to establish adaptive 27 aquatic safety services as an available habilitative service option for 28 individuals with disabilities who require individualized aquatic safety 29 instruction consistent with federal home and community-based services 30 authority. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16147-01-6 S. 10660 2 1 § 2. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 365-q 2 to read as follows: 3 § 365-q. Adaptive aquatic safety services. 1. For purposes of this 4 section, "adaptive aquatic safety services" shall mean individualized 5 habilitative services provided in a community aquatic environment that 6 are designed to develop, maintain, or improve functional aquatic safety 7 skills for individuals with disabilities who require adaptive instruc- 8 tion due to disability-related functional limitations. Such services may 9 include, but shall not be limited to: 10 (a) water hazard recognition; 11 (b) emergency response behaviors; 12 (c) safe aquatic entry and exit skills; 13 (d) drowning prevention and risk mitigation skills; 14 (e) adaptive communication and safety strategies; and 15 (f) caregiver or support person training where appropriate. 16 2. The commissioner of health, in consultation with the commissioner 17 of the office for people with developmental disabilities and other 18 appropriate state agencies, shall evaluate and, where appropriate, seek 19 approval from the federal centers for Medicare and Medicaid services for 20 the inclusion of adaptive aquatic safety services as an available 21 service component under applicable Medicaid home and community-based 22 services authorities, including waivers authorized pursuant to section 23 1915(c) of the federal Social Security Act. 24 3. The commissioner shall ensure that any adaptive aquatic safety 25 services authorized pursuant to this section: 26 (a) are provided pursuant to person-centered planning requirements; 27 (b) are based upon identified functional needs related to health, 28 safety, independence, or community participation; 29 (c) include measurable outcomes; and 30 (d) are designed primarily to address health, safety, independence, or 31 community participation goals and are not provided solely as recreation- 32 al activities. 33 4. The commissioner shall establish provider qualification standards 34 for adaptive aquatic safety services, which may include requirements 35 relating to: 36 (a) adaptive aquatic instruction; 37 (b) disability competency; 38 (c) communication strategies; 39 (d) behavioral support strategies; 40 (e) experience providing instruction to individuals with disabilities; 41 and 42 (f) aquatic emergency response. 43 5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the ability of 44 individuals eligible for self-directed services to access adaptive 45 aquatic safety services consistent with applicable self-direction 46 requirements. 47 6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require reimbursement 48 for general recreational swimming instruction that does not satisfy 49 applicable Medicaid requirements. 50 § 3. The executive law is amended by adding a new article 49-D to read 51 as follows: 52 ARTICLE 49-D 53 ADAPTIVE AQUATIC ACCESSIBILITY 54 Section 997. Adaptive aquatic accessibility at state-funded public 55 aquatic facilities. S. 10660 3 1 § 997. Adaptive aquatic accessibility at state-funded public aquatic 2 facilities. 1. Any state agency, public authority, public benefit corpo- 3 ration, or other entity administering state financial assistance for the 4 construction, reconstruction, renovation, rehabilitation, expansion, or 5 improvement of a public aquatic facility shall require each applicant to 6 describe, as part of its application for such assistance, how the 7 proposed facility will provide and promote access for individuals with 8 disabilities. 9 2. Such description may include, but need not be limited to: 10 (a) partnerships with qualified providers of adaptive aquatic safety 11 services; 12 (b) opportunities for adaptive aquatic safety instruction; 13 (c) inclusive aquatic programming for individuals with disabilities; 14 (d) accessibility of the aquatic facility and related amenities; and 15 (e) policies facilitating the use of the facility by providers 16 furnishing adaptive aquatic safety services. 17 3. In evaluating applications for state financial assistance, the 18 administering entity shall consider and, notwithstanding any other 19 provision of law, prioritize the applicant's proposed efforts to improve 20 access for individuals with disabilities as one factor among others 21 established by law, regulation, or program guidelines. 22 4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an applicant 23 to establish a particular aquatic program or to provide Medicaid-reim- 24 bursable services. 25 § 4. Section 206 of the public health law is amended by adding a new 26 subdivision 32 to read as follows: 27 32. (a) The commissioner shall promulgate regulations requiring every 28 lifeguard certification and lifeguard recertification course approved or 29 recognized by the department to include not less than three hours of 30 instruction concerning aquatic safety for individuals with disabilities. 31 (b) Such instruction shall include, but not be limited to: 32 (i) disability awareness and competency; 33 (ii) communication strategies for individuals with physical, develop- 34 mental, intellectual, cognitive, sensory, and behavioral disabilities; 35 (iii) disability-related drowning risk factors; 36 (iv) supervision and emergency response considerations; 37 (v) adaptive drowning prevention strategies; 38 (vi) interaction with caregivers and support persons; and 39 (vii) inclusive aquatic safety instruction practices. 40 (c) In developing such curriculum, the commissioner may consult with 41 adaptive aquatic providers, disability advocacy organizations, 42 nationally recognized lifeguard certifying agencies, and other subject 43 matter experts. 44 § 5. The education law is amended by adding a new section 4411 to read 45 as follows: 46 § 4411. Adaptive aquatic safety. 1. School districts and boards of 47 cooperative educational services may incorporate adaptive aquatic safety 48 goals into individualized education programs where appropriate to 49 address health, safety, community participation, transition planning, or 50 independent living skills. 51 2. The commissioner shall issue guidance regarding coordination 52 between educational programming and adaptive aquatic safety services 53 authorized pursuant to section three hundred sixty-five-q of the social 54 services law. 55 § 6. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 56 it shall have become a law.